Illinois, session 104th, HB1153.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Local 5Official Vacancy Posting Act. 6    Section 5. Posting of elected official vacancies. A unit 7of local government shall post every elected official vacancy 8on its website, if the website is maintained by the unit of 9local government's full-time staff. The posting shall remain 10on the website until the vacancy is filled. 11    Section 10. Posting on county website. In addition to the 12postings required under Section 5, a unit of local government 13shall submit every elected official vacancy to the county 14clerk in the county in which the unit is located and the county 15clerk shall post the information on the county website. The 16posting shall remain on the website until the unit of local 17government informs the county clerk that the vacancy has been 18filled. 19    Section 15. Filling of elected official vacancies after 20posting. If the unit of local government has a website 21maintained by the unit of local government's full-time staff,   HB1153- 2 -LRB104 05747 RTM 15777 b1then the unit of local government may not fill the vacancy 2until the posting has been on the website for at least 15 days. 3If the unit of local government does not have a website 4maintained by the unit of local government's full-time staff, 5then the unit of local government may not fill the vacancy 6until the posting has been on the county website for at least 715 days. 8    Section 90. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 9the posting of elected official vacancies in a manner 10inconsistent with this Act. This Act is a limitation under 11subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 12Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule units of 13powers and functions exercised by the State.